South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4524.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 3, Chapter 7, Title 44 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 44-7-305.  (A) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, video cameras must be installed at all entrances, exits, and common areas of every nursing home or other skilled nursing care facility licensed by the department and at all entrances, exits, and common areas of every assisted living center or other community residential care facility licensed by the department, for the purposes of continuously monitoring the entrances, exits, and common areas of these facilities. The department shall establish a system for maintaining the recorded images produced by continuous video monitoring through regulations promulgated pursuant to this section. (B) For the purposes of this section, "common area" means an area of a nursing home or other skilled nursing care facility, or of an assisted living center or other community residential care facility, that all patients or residents share including, but not limited to, dining areas, recreational areas, meeting areas, and hallways. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----